Utah statutes.
72-6-105.   Contracts for construction and maintenance -- Agreements with county or municipality.

The department may enter into written agreements on behalf of the state with any county or municipality for rights-of-way and the construction or maintenance of any part of a state highway:

(1)  at the expense of the state;

(2)  at the expense of any county or municipality; or

(3)  at the joint expense of the state and any county and any municipality.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

